California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(A) Any object code, machine code, or other code readable by a computer when loaded into its memory and used directly by the computer to execute instructions.

(B) Any related user manuals.

(4) “Owner” includes, with respect to any software, the developer of the software.

(5) A person shall be treated as related to another person if the persons are related persons under Section 267 or 707(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(6) “Tax-related computer software source code” means the computer source code for any computer software program intended for accounting, tax return preparation or compliance, or tax planning.

(e) This section and Section 19542.3 shall not apply to any software acquired or developed for internal use by the Franchise Tax Board.

(f) This section shall apply to subpoenas issued, and software acquired, after the effective date of the act adding this section. In the case of any software acquired on or before the effective date of the act adding this section, the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall apply after the 90th day after the effective
 date of the act adding this section. The preceding sentence shall not apply to the requirement under clause (ii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 931, Sec. 27.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19504.7.

(a) An officer or employee of the Franchise Tax Board may not contact any person other than the taxpayer with respect to the determination or collection of the tax liability of the taxpayer without providing reasonable notice in advance to the taxpayer that contacts with persons other than the taxpayer may be made. The notice shall explain that a request may be made as provided in subdivision (b). A notice shall be valid for any third-party contacts made during the 12 months following the date of the notice. For any third-party contacts
 made after the expiration of the 12 months, an additional preliminary notice must be provided. This subdivision shall not apply if mail to the same address is returned undeliverable with no forwarding address. The notice shall not be required if the unpaid tax for which notice would otherwise be required under this paragraph is consolidated for collection purposes with a preexisting unpaid tax for which notice has been given under this paragraph with respect to that described preexisting unpaid tax of the person.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide, upon request from the taxpayer, a record of persons contacted during that 12-month period by the Franchise Tax Board with respect to the determination or collection of the tax liability of the taxpayer. The taxpayer’s request shall be made no later than 60 days after the 12-month period has expired.

(c) This section shall not
 apply:

(1) To any contact which the taxpayer has authorized.

(2) If the Franchise Tax Board determines for good cause shown that the notice would jeopardize collection of any tax or the notice may involve reprisal against any person.

(3) With respect to any pending criminal investigation.

(d) This section shall be operative for contacts made after 180 days after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 931, Sec. 28.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19505.

The Franchise Tax Board may appoint and remove, in the manner provided by law, those officers, agents, branch office income tax deputies, and other employees as it deems necessary. They shall have the duties and powers as the Franchise Tax Board from time to time prescribes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19506.

The Franchise Tax Board may appoint one or more deputies or assistants to conduct hearings, prescribe regulations, or perform any other duty imposed by this part or other laws of the state upon the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19507.

Any temporary appointments of branch office income tax deputies and other branch office employees shall be made from eligible residents of the district in which the branch office is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19508.

The salaries of the personnel required by the Franchise Tax Board shall be such as it may prescribe, in the manner provided by law, and the Franchise Tax Board and its personnel shall be allowed reasonable and necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19509.

The Franchise Tax Board may require officers, agents, deputies, and other employees designated by it to give bond for the faithful performance of their duties in the sum and with the sureties as it may determine. It shall pay all premiums on the bonds out of moneys appropriated for the administration of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19511.

The Franchise Tax Board and officers and employees designated by it may administer an oath to any person or take the acknowledgment of any person in respect of any return or report required by this part or the rules and regulations of the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19512.

Any person acting in a fiduciary capacity shall assume the duties and, upon giving notice to the Franchise Tax Board, shall assume the rights and privileges of the taxpayers in respect of any tax, additions to tax, penalties, and interest imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part except as otherwise specifically provided, until he or she gives notice that his or her fiduciary has terminated. He or she shall give notice under this section pursuant to rules and regulations
 prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19516.

Every fiduciary who pays in whole or in part any claim, other than claims for taxes, expenses of administration, funeral expenses, expenses of last illness, family allowance, or wage claims as defined in Section 11402 of the Probate Code, against the person, estate, or trust for whom or for which the fiduciary acts, or who makes any distribution of the assets of the person, estate, or trust, before satisfaction and payment of taxes, interest, and penalties, except penalties due from a decedent, which are imposed by Part 10
 (commencing with Section 17001) or this part on the person, estate, or trust for whom or for which the fiduciary acts, or which constitute a claim against the person, estate, or trust, or which are a lien or charge on or against the assets of the person, estate, or trust, is personally liable to the state for the taxes, interest, and penalties to the extent of the payments and distributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19517.

(a) In the case of income received or accrued during the lifetime of a decedent, or by his or her estate during the period of administration, or by a trust, the Franchise Tax Board shall mail notices proposing to assess the tax, and shall commence any proceeding in court without assessment for the collection of the tax, within 18 months after written request therefor (filed after the return is made) by the fiduciary of the estate or trust or by any other person liable for the tax or any portion thereof.

(b) After filing a request pursuant to subdivision (a), a fiduciary may consent in writing to waive the limitation prescribed by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19518.

(a) The trustee of a trust described in Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code which is exempt from tax under Section 17631 to which contributions have been paid under a plan on behalf of any owner-employee (as defined in Section 401(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code), and each insurance company or other person which is the issuer of
 a contract purchased by such a trust, or purchased under a plan described in Section 403(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, contributions for which have been paid on behalf of any owner-employee, shall file the returns (in the form and at the times), keep the records, make the identification of contracts and funds (and accounts within the funds), and supply the information, as the Franchise Tax Board shall by forms or regulations prescribe.

(b) Every individual on whose behalf contributions have been paid as an owner-employee (as defined in Section 401(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code)—(1) To a trust described in Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code which is exempt from tax under Section 17631, or(2) To an insurance company
 or other person under a plan described in Section 403(a) of the Internal Revenue Code,shall furnish the trustee, insurance company, or other person, as the case may be, the information at the times and in the form and manner as the Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe by forms or regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19519.

The Franchise Tax Board shall transmit to the Director of Employment Development claims for credit or refund allowed pursuant to Section 17061 of this code and subdivision (a) of Section 1176.5 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19520.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, if a provision of law, including Section 1088.5 and Section 1088.8 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, authorizes the use of information for tax enforcement purposes, the term “tax enforcement” includes the collection of any amount referred to the Franchise Tax Board for collection under a provision of law that authorizes the Franchise Tax Board to collect that amount in the same manner as an unpaid tax liability is collected by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 455, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

19521.

(a) The rate established under this section (referred to in other code sections as “the adjusted annual rate”) shall be determined in accordance with Section 6621 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that:

(1) (A) For taxpayers other than corporations, the overpayment rate specified in Section 6621(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue
 Code shall be modified to be equal to the underpayment rate determined under Section 6621(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) In the case of any corporation, for purposes of determining interest on overpayments for periods beginning before July 1, 2002, the overpayment rate specified in Section 6621(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified to be equal to the underpayment rate determined under Section 6621(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(C) In the case of any corporation, for purposes of determining interest on overpayments for periods beginning on or after July 1, 2002, the overpayment rate specified in Section 6621(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified to be the lesser of 5 percent or the bond equivalent rate of 13-week United States Treasury bills, determined as follows:

(i) The
 bond equivalent rate of 13-week United States Treasury bills established at the first auction held during the month of January shall be utilized in determining the appropriate rate for the following July 1 to December 31, inclusive. Any such rate shall be rounded to the nearest full percent (or, if a multiple of one-half of 1 percent, that rate shall be increased to the next highest full percent).

(ii) The bond equivalent rate of 13-week United States Treasury bills established at the first auction held during the month of July shall be utilized in determining the appropriate rate for the following January 1 to June 30, inclusive. Any such rate shall be rounded to the nearest full percent (or, if a multiple of one-half of 1 percent, that rate shall be increased to the next highest full percent).

(2) The determination specified in Section 6621(b) of the Internal Revenue Code shall
 be modified to be determined semiannually as follows:

(A) The rate for January shall apply during the following July through December, and

(B) The rate for July shall apply during the following January through June.

(b) (1) For purposes of this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), Part 32 (commencing with Section 61000), Title 25 (commencing with Section 100800) of the Government Code, and any other provision of law referencing this method of computation, in computing the amount of any interest required to be paid by the state or by the taxpayer, or any other amount determined by reference to that amount of interest, that interest and that amount shall be compounded daily.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply for purposes of computing the amount of any addition to tax under Section 19136 or 19142.

(c) Section 6621(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to increase in underpayment rate for large corporate underpayments, is modified as follows:

(1) The applicable date shall be the 30th day after the earlier of either of the following:

(A) The date on which the proposed deficiency assessment is issued.

(B) The date on which the notice and demand is sent.

(2) This subdivision shall apply for purposes of determining interest for periods after December 31, 1991.

(3) Section
 6621(c)(2)(B)(iii) of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply for purposes of determining interest for periods after December 31, 1998.

(d) Section 6621(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the elimination of interest on overlapping periods of tax overpayments and underpayments, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 39.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19522.

(a) (1) (A) On or before the 10th of January each year, the Franchise Tax Board shall submit to the Legislature a report on all changes to the Internal Revenue Code enacted into law in the prior year. To the extent possible, the report shall contain an estimate of the revenue effect of conforming California law to each of those changes.

(B) In the event that changes to the Internal Revenue Code are
 enacted after September 15 of any year, the report described in subparagraph (A) shall be submitted to the Legislature within 120 days after signature by the President of the United States, rather than the 10th of January.

(2) The report required by this section shall be made available to the public.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the policy committee of each house of the Legislature hold at least one public hearing on the report required by this section.

(b) For any introduced bill which proposes changes in any of the dates in Section 17024.5, the Franchise Tax Board shall prepare a complete analysis of the bill which describes all changes to state law which will automatically occur by reference to federal law as of the changed date. The Franchise Tax Board shall immediately update and supplement that
 analysis upon any amendment to the bill. That analysis shall be made available to the public and shall be submitted to the Legislature for publication in the daily journal of each house of the Legislature. The digest of the Legislative Counsel shall indicate that an analysis of the bill shall be prepared by the Franchise Tax Board and printed in the daily journal of each house of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19523.

If the Secretary of the Treasury has, under the authority of Section 330(c) of Title 31 of the United States Code:

(a) Assessed a penalty under Section 6701(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, and

(b) Provided that appraisals by an appraiser shall not have any probative effect in any administrative proceeding before the Department of the Treasury or the Internal Revenue Service, and

(c) Barred that appraiser from presenting evidence or testimony in that proceeding, then appraisals by that person shall be presumed to have no probative effect in any administrative proceeding before the State Board of Equalization or the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19523.5.

(a) If the United States Secretary of the Treasury has, under the authority of Section 330(b) of Subchapter II of Chapter 3 of Subtitle 1 of Title 31 of the United States Code, suspended or disbarred a person from practice before the United States Department of the Treasury, the Franchise Tax Board shall, after notice and opportunity for a proceeding, suspend or disbar that person from practice before the Franchise Tax Board during the period of federal suspension or disbarment, unless the action of the United State Secretary of the
 Treasury was clearly erroneous.

(b) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Practice” or “practices” means all matters connected with a presentation to the Franchise Tax Board or any of its officers or employees relating to a taxpayer’s rights, privileges, or liabilities under laws or regulations administered by the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) “Presentations” means, but is not limited to, preparing and filing documents, corresponding and communicating with the Franchise Tax Board, and representing a client at conferences, hearings, and meetings.

(c) (1) Every person who practices before the Franchise Tax Board and is suspended or disbarred from practice before the United States Department of the
 Treasury shall notify the Franchise Tax Board, in writing, within 45 days of the issuance of a final order disbarring or suspending the person pursuant to Section 10.80 of Subpart D of Part 10 of Subtitle A of Title 31 of the Code of Federal Regulations, revised as of July 26, 2002.

(2) Any person that fails to notify the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be subject to a penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(d) The written notice required by subdivision (c) shall concede the accuracy of the federal action, or state the reason or reasons why the federal action is clearly erroneous.

(e) Any person that has been suspended or disbarred from practice before the Franchise Tax Board may seek review of that determination by bringing an action pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil
 Procedure.

(f) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe any regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

(g) This section shall be effective for final federal orders of disbarment or suspension issued on or after the enactment date of this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 74, Sec. 71.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19525.

The Franchise Tax Board, under regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, may establish a reward program for information resulting in the identification of underreported or unreported income subject to taxes imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001). Any reward may not exceed 10 percent of the taxes collected as a result of the information provided. Any person employed by or under contract with any state or federal tax collection agency shall not be eligible for a reward
 provided for pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19526.

The Franchise Tax Board shall develop and maintain a taxpayer cross-reference file which shall be used as a part of a nonwage earner filing enforcement program. The taxpayer cross-reference file may include information from taxpayer identification information available from tax returns, application forms, other documents, and any other files as already exist and are maintained by the state’s major revenue agencies. The taxpayer cross-reference file shall only be used for the purposes of tax law enforcement and
 administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19528.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Franchise Tax Board may require any board, as defined in Section 22 of the Business and Professions Code, and the State Bar, the Bureau of Real Estate, and the Insurance Commissioner (hereinafter referred to as licensing board) to provide to the Franchise Tax Board the following information with respect to every licensee:

(1) Name.

(2) Address or addresses of record.

(3) Federal employer identification number, if the licensee is a partnership, or the licensee’s individual taxpayer identification number or social
 security number of all other licensees.

(4) Type of license.

(5) Effective date of license or renewal.

(6) Expiration date of license.

(7) Whether license is active or inactive, if known.

(8) Whether license is new or renewal.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board may do the following:

(1) Send a notice to any licensee failing to provide the federal employer identification number, individual taxpayer identification number, or social security number as required by subdivision (a) of Section 30 of
 the Business and Professions Code and subdivision (a) of Section 1666.5 of the Insurance Code, describing the information that was missing, the penalty associated with not providing it, and that failure to provide the information within 30 days will result in the assessment of the penalty.

(2) After 30 days following the issuance of the notice described in paragraph (1), assess a one-hundred-dollar ($100) penalty, due and payable upon notice and demand, for any licensee failing to provide either its federal employer identification number (if the licensee is a partnership) or the licensee’s individual taxpayer identification number or social security number (for all others) as required in Section 30 of the Business and Professions Code and Section 1666.5 of the Insurance Code.

(c) Notwithstanding Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code, the information furnished to the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Section 30 of the Business and Professions Code or Section 1666.5 of the Insurance Code shall not be deemed to be a public record and shall not be open to the public for inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 419.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

19529.

The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Registrar of Contractors of the Contractors State License Board, the Director of Employment Development, the Economic and Employment Enforcement Coalition, and the Joint Enforcement Strike Force on the Underground Economy upon the arraignment of or the filing of criminal charges against any individual for a violation of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 19701) of this Part if that individual engages in the business or acts in the capacity of a contractor within this state pursuant to a license issued by the Contractors
 State License Board or if that individual unlawfully engages in the business or acts in the capacity of a contractor within this state without having a license therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 428, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19530.

The Franchise Tax Board shall preserve reports and tax returns for three years from the due dates thereof and thereafter until it orders them to be destroyed. Information returns and other documents filed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 18631) or Article 5 (commencing with Section 18661) of Chapter 2 shall be preserved until the Franchise Tax Board orders them to be destroyed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19532.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may charge fees for its “Tax News” publication and its “California Package X.” The fees shall include preparation and production costs and other related costs, including, but not limited to, the handling of requests, printing, and postage.

(b) This section shall not apply to documents distributed to public distribution sites.

(c) Fees received under this section shall be handled in accordance with Section 19605.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19531 (as added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31) by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 208.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19533.

(a) In the event the debtor has more than one debt being collected by the Franchise Tax Board and the amount collected by the Franchise Tax Board is insufficient to satisfy the total amount owing, the amount collected shall be applied in the following priority:

(1) Payment of any taxes, additions to tax, penalties, interest, fees, or other amounts due and payable under Part 7.5 (commencing with Section 13201), Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), Part 32 (commencing with Section 61000), or this part, amounts authorized to be collected under Section 19722 of this code, or payment of advanced premium subsides in excess of the amount allowed under Title 25 (commencing with Section 100800) of the Government Code.

(2) Payment of delinquencies collected under Section 10878.

(3) Payment of any amounts due that are referred for collection under Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 19280) of Chapter 5.

(4) Payment of any delinquencies referred for collection under Article 7 (commencing with Section 19291) of Chapter 5.

(5) Payment of any taxes imposed under Part 10.8 (commencing with Section 22000).

(b) Notwithstanding the payment priority established by this section, voluntary payments designated by the taxpayer as payment for a personal income tax liability or as a payment on amounts authorized to
 be collected under Section 19722, shall not be applied pursuant to this priority, but shall instead be applied as designated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 28.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Disclosure of Information [19542. - 19572.5.]

19542.

Except as otherwise provided in this article and as required to administer Section 19005, it is a misdemeanor for the Franchise Tax Board or any member thereof, or any deputy, agent, clerk, or other officer or employee of the state, including its political subdivisions, or a jury commissioner, or any former officer or employee or other individual, who in the course of their employment or duty has or had access to returns, reports, or documents required to be filed under this part, to disclose or make known in any manner information as to the amount of income or any particulars, including the business affairs of a corporation, set forth or disclosed therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 230, Sec. 2.   (SB 592)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19542.1.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by this article, it shall be unlawful for any person described in Section 19542 to willfully inspect any confidential information furnished or secured pursuant to this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001). For purposes of this section, “inspection” means any examination of confidential information. Any willful unauthorized inspection or unwarranted disclosure or use of confidential information by the persons described in Section 19542 is a
 misdemeanor.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board shall notify a taxpayer of any known incidents of willful unauthorized inspection or unwarranted disclosure or use of his or her confidential tax records, but only if criminal charges have been filed for the willful unauthorized inspection or unwarranted disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 623, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19542.3.

Any person who willfully divulges or makes known software, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 19504.5, to any person in violation of Section 19504.5 is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or in the state prison, at the discretion of the court, by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, at the discretion of the court, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 347, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19543.

(a) “Business affairs,” as used in this article means the details relative to the business activities of the entity as disclosed by the return but shall exclude extraneous matters, such as the exact corporate title, corporate number, the date of commencement of business in this state, taxable year adopted, filing date of return, name, date and title of individuals signing affidavit to the return, due date of taxes, taxes unpaid, entity’s address, private address of officers and directors.

(b) Extraneous matters shall not be disclosed unless the request for the information states the names of the entities as to which information is desired and only if there is no reason to believe that the information will be used for commercial list purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19544.

Nothing in Section 19542, or in any other provision of law, shall be construed to require the disclosure of standards used or to be used for the selection of returns for examination, or data used or to be used for determining those standards, if the Franchise Tax Board determines that the disclosure will seriously impair assessment, collection, or enforcement under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19545.

A return or return information may be disclosed in a judicial or administrative proceeding pertaining to tax administration, if any of the following apply:

(a) The taxpayer is a party to the proceeding, or the proceeding arose out of, or in connection with, determining the taxpayer’s civil or criminal liability, or the collection of the taxpayer’s civil liability with respect to any tax imposed under this part.

(b) The treatment of an item reflected on the return is directly related to the resolution of an issue in the proceeding.

(c) The return or return information directly relates to a transactional relationship between a person who is a party to the proceeding and the taxpayer which directly affects the resolution of an issue in the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19546.

Upon request of a committee appointed by either the Assembly or the Senate, or both, any information may be furnished to the committee, but it is a misdemeanor for the committee or any member, clerk, or other officer or employee thereof to disclose in any manner any particulars of the information so furnished except to law enforcement officers for the purpose of aiding the detection or prosecution of crimes committed in violation of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19546.5.

Any person who otherwise has or had access to any return or return information may disclose the return or return information to a committee appointed by the Assembly or Senate, or both, or any member, clerk, or other officer or employee thereof, if the person believes the return or return information may relate to possible board misconduct, maladministration, or taxpayer abuse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 931, Sec. 31.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19547.

In a matter involving tax administration under this part, a return or return information shall be open to inspection by the Attorney General or other legal representatives of the state, if any of the following apply:

(a) The taxpayer is or may be a party to the proceeding, or the proceeding arose out of, or in connection with, determining the taxpayer’s civil or criminal liability, or the collection of the taxpayer’s civil liability with respect to any tax imposed under
 Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(b) The treatment of an item reflected on the return is or may be related to the resolution of an issue in the proceeding or investigation.

(c) The return or return information relates or may relate to a transactional relationship between a person who is a party to the proceeding and the taxpayer, which affects or may affect, the resolution of an issue in the proceeding or investigation.

In addition, the Attorney General may inspect any report or return required under this part when required in the enforcement of any public or charitable trust or in compelling adherence to any charitable purposes for which any nonprofit corporation is formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19547.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law, the Franchise Tax Board shall make available to the Attorney General a list of retail sellers and manufacturers required to disclose efforts to eradicate slavery and human trafficking pursuant to Section 1714.43 of the Civil Code. The list shall be based on tax returns filed for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011.

(2) Each list required by this section shall be submitted annually to the Attorney General by November 30, 2012, and each November 30 thereafter. The list shall be derived from original tax returns received by the Franchise Tax Board on or before December 31, 2011, and each December 31 thereafter.

(b) Each annual list required by this section shall include the following information for each retail seller or manufacturer:

(1) Entity name.

(2) California identification number.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 556, Sec. 4.   (SB 657)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19548.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board, upon request by the California Parent Locator Service, may disclose to the California Parent Locator Service, pursuant to Section 17505 or 17506 of the Family Code, any taxpayer return information that may be of assistance in locating alleged abducting or absent parents, spouses, or former spouses, in enforcing their liability for child support or the liability for spousal support, in establishing a parent and child relationship, and in locating and returning abducted children to their parents.

(b) Information disclosed to the California Parent Locator Service pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be disseminated by the California Parent Locator Service only as provided for by, and only for the purposes specified in, Section 17505 or 17506 of the Family Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 478, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

19548.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law and in accordance with Section 120962 of the Health and Safety Code, the State Department of Public Health shall disclose the name and individual taxpayer identification number (ITIN) or social security number of an applicant for, or recipient of services pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 120950) of Part 4 of Division 105 of the Health and Safety Code to the Franchise Tax Board for the purpose of verifying the modified adjusted gross income of, any tax-exempt interest received by, any tax-exempt social security benefits received by, and any foreign earned income of an applicant or recipient.

(b) (1) The Franchise Tax
 Board, upon receipt of this information, shall inform the State Department of Public Health of all of the following:

(A) The amounts of the federal adjusted gross income received by the taxpayer household as reported by the taxpayer to the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) The amounts of the California adjusted gross income received by the taxpayer household as reported by the taxpayer to the Franchise Tax Board or as adjusted by the Franchise Tax Board.

(C) The amount of any tax-exempt interest received by the taxpayer household, as reported to the Franchise Tax Board.

(D) The amount of any tax-exempt social security benefits received by the taxpayer household, as
 reported to the Franchise Tax Board.

(E) The amount of any foreign earned income of the taxpayer household, as reported to the Franchise Tax Board.

(F) The family size of the taxpayer household, as reported to the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide the information to the State Department of Public Health for the most recent taxable year that the Franchise Tax Board has information available, and shall include the first and last name, date of birth, and the ITIN or social security number of the taxpayer.

(c) (1) Information provided by the State Department of Public Health pursuant to this section shall
 constitute confidential public health records as defined in Section 121035 of the Health and Safety Code, and shall remain subject to the confidentiality protections and restrictions on further disclosure by the recipient under subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 121025 of the Health and Safety Code.
